Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2509
Jurisdiction by act of foreign personal representative.

A foreign personal representative submits himself personally to the jurisdiction of the courts of this state in any proceeding relating to the estate by (1) filing authenticated copies of his appointment as provided in section 30-2505, (2) receiving payment of money or taking delivery of personal property under section 30-2502, or (3) doing any act as a personal representative in this state which would have given the state jurisdiction over him as an individual. Jurisdiction under (2) is limited to the money or value of personal property collected.

Laws 1974, LB 354, § 215, UPC § 4-301.